Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 11

Loans

45-2-1101. Loans authorized.

Any state bank may lend money and discount or purchase evidences of indebtedness and any agreement for the payment of money.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.241); T.C.A., § 45-428.

Cross-References. Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 48.

Law Reviews.

“Bad Faith Breach”: A New and Growing Concern for Financial Institutions, 42 Vand. L. Rev. 891 (1989).

Lender Liability: A Survey of Common-Law Theories, 42 Vand. L. Rev. 855 (1989).

Lender Liability and Arbitration: Preserving the Fabric of Relationship, 42 Vand. L. Rev. 947 (1989).

Written Agreements in the Lender-Borrower Context: The Illusion of Certainty, 42 Vand. L. Rev. 917 (1989).

45-2-1102. Limit of loans to any one borrower — Classified loans.

Except as provided in this section, no state bank shall be allowed to lend to any one (1) person, firm or corporation (including loans to a firm or loans to the several members thereof) more than fifteen percent (15%) of its capital, surplus and undivided profits. However, the loans may be in excess of that percent, but not above twenty-five percent (25%) except as provided in subsection (b), if each specific loan in excess of fifteen percent (15%) is first submitted to and approved in advance in writing by the board of directors or by the finance committee of the bank and a record is kept of the written approval.

No loan limit shall be applicable to any state bank in any situation or circumstance in which no loan limit is applicable to national banks.

No loan limit shall be applicable to the extent that the loan or extension of credit is secured by a segregated deposit account in the lending bank.

Obligations of any person in the form of notes or drafts secured by shipping documents, warehouse receipts or other documents transferring or securing title covering readily marketable nonperishable staples shall be subject to a limitation equal to the percent of the sum of the lending bank's capital, surplus, and undivided profits shown in column A below, when the market value of the staples securing the obligations is not at any time less than the percent of the face amount of the obligation shown in column B below:

Column A Column B

25% 115%

30% 120%

35% 125%

40% 130%

45% 135%

50% 140%

The exceptions listed in subdivision (b)(1) do not apply to obligations of any one (1) person, copartnership, association or corporation arising from the same staples, for more than ten (10) months.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a state bank or bank holding company may not sell a classified loan or participation in a classified loan to, or purchase the loan or participation from, another financial institution without obtaining the prior approval of the commissioner.

For purposes of subdivision (c)(1):

“Classified loan” means a loan that is designated “substandard,” “doubtful,” or “loss” in the most recent state or federal report of examination; and

“Financial institution” means a bank, savings bank, savings and loan association or any subsidiary of those entities, industrial loan and thrift company, credit union, mortgage broker, mortgage banker, or leasing company accepting deposits, making or arranging loans and making or arranging leases.

The loan limit applicable to any one (1) person under this section shall take into consideration credit exposure arising from derivative transactions between the state bank and the person.

For purposes of subdivision (d)(1), “derivative transaction” includes any transaction that is a contract, agreement, swap, warrant, note, or option that is based, in whole or in part, on the value of, any interest in, or any quantitative measure or the occurrence of any event relating to, one (1) or more commodities, securities, currencies, interest or other rates, indices, or other assets.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.241); T.C.A., § 45-429; Acts 1983, ch. 69, § 1; 1984, ch. 573, § 1; 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 2001, ch. 54, §§ 17, 18; 2012, ch. 634, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Section 3 of Acts 1984, ch. 573, provided that the 1984 amendment shall not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before April 27, 1984.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 48.

Law Reviews.

State Regulation of Bank Holding Companies and the Future of Interstate Banking: A Tennessee Perspective (Colman B. Hoffman and Kathryn R. Edge), 51 Tenn. L. Rev. 383 (1984).

45-2-1103. Loans to officers and directors.

Compliance with the requirements of 12 U.S.C. §§ 375a, 375b, and 1828(j) and applicable federal regulations shall be deemed compliance with the laws of Tennessee concerning loans to directors and officers of state banks.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.241); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-430; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 1; 2001, ch. 54, § 19.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 48.

45-2-1104. Loans and transactions involving banks own stock as collateral or otherwise.

A state bank may make a loan secured by not more than fifty percent (50%) of the book value of its own stock upon the approval of a majority of the bank's board of directors; provided, that this subsection (a) shall not permit a purchase money loan for the initial acquisition of the bank's own stock. Loans secured by the bank's own stock shall be limited to and shall not exceed:

In the aggregate, twenty percent (20%) of the bank's capital, surplus and undivided profits; or

To any one (1) borrower, ten percent (10%) of the bank's capital, surplus and undivided profits.(2) A loan that is otherwise adequately secured to the extent required of loans of the type provided and in which the bank's stock is taken as additional or secondary collateral shall not be included in the limits provided in this subsection (a).

Except as expressly limited or restricted in this title, a state bank may engage in transactions involving its own stock, including, but not limited to, the transfer, repurchase, holding, sale or division, to the same extent permitted to corporations under the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 11-27.

The bank shall give the commissioner thirty (30) days' advance notice of any proposed transaction and may consummate the transaction at the end of the thirty-day period unless the commissioner advises the bank in writing of the commissioner's objection to the proposed transaction.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.241); T.C.A., § 45-431; Acts 1996, ch. 768, § 23; 2001, ch. 54, § 20.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 48.

45-2-1105. Participation with other lenders.

A state bank may participate in a loan with another lender to the extent that its participation does not exceed its legal limit for the type of loan except that participation may not violate §45-2-1102(c).

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.241); T.C.A., § 45-432; Acts 1984, ch. 573, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Section 3 of Acts 1984, ch. 573, provided that the 1984 amendment did not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before April 27, 1984.

45-2-1106. Installment loans — Interest and insurance.

In addition to all other powers granted them elsewhere in this chapter and chapter 1 of this title, banks have the power to make installment loans, either secured or unsecured, with repayment in equal, or substantially equal, monthly or other periodic installments over the term of the loans.

Interest computed on the principal amount of the loan for the entire term of the loan at a rate not to exceed six percent (6%) per annum may be either deducted in advance or added to the principal; provided, that if the unpaid balance of the loan is either paid or renewed prior to its maturity date, the borrower or other person paying or renewing the loan shall be refunded or credited with unearned interest in an amount that represents at least as great a proportion of the original charge as the sum of the periodical time balances after the date of prepayment bears to the sum of all the periodical time balances under the schedule of payments in the original installment loan; provided, that the bank shall not be required to make a refund or credit where the amount thereof would be less than one dollar ($1.00) for each loan. In no event, however, shall the effective rate of interest on any loan made pursuant hereto, when computed from its inception to its originally contracted maturity, exceed the annual rates as follows:

Ten and fifty-three one hundredths percent (10.53%) on loans of less than six (6) months;

Eleven and fifty-eight one hundredths percent (11.58%) on loans as long as six (6) months but less than twelve (12) months;

Twelve and fifty-nine one hundredths percent (12.59%) on loans as long as twelve (12) months but less than twenty-four (24) months;

Thirteen and thirty-eight one hundredths percent (13.38%) on loans as long as twenty-four (24) months but less than thirty-six (36) months;

Fourteen and seventeen one hundredths percent (14.17%) on loans as long as thirty-six (36) months but less than forty-eight (48) months;

Fifteen and four one hundredths percent (15.04%) on loans as long as forty-eight (48) months but less than sixty (60) months;

Sixteen and two one hundredths percent (16.02%) on loans as long as sixty (60) months but less than seventy-two (72) months;

Seventeen and fifteen one hundredths percent (17.15%) on loans as long as seventy-two (72) months but less than eighty-four (84) months; and

Eighteen and zero one hundredths percent (18.00%) on all loans for a period of eighty-four (84) months or longer.

Notwithstanding any other provision herein to the contrary, the nominal rate of interest on any loan permitted by this section shall not exceed six percent (6%) per annum.

In addition to such interest, a bank may require a borrower to pay loan charges in accordance with the following:

A bank may require a borrower to make, or require a borrower to reimburse the bank for having made, to third parties payments necessary or incidental to the loan, including insurance premiums, official fees, taxes, appraisal fees, fees for title examination, attorney fees for documenting or closing the loan, fees for inspection or control of collateral, and, upon default, all costs of collection, including reasonable attorney's fees;

A bank may require a borrower to pay to the bank a reasonable sum to reimburse the bank for its direct cost in originating, making, securing, processing, servicing and collecting the loan, and the reasonable sum may be an approximation of the direct costs; provided, that the approximation may be based on the bank's actual average cost; and provided further, that the approximation shall never exceed an amount equal to four percent (4%) of the principal amount of the loan; and provided further, that a bank may make a flat charge of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) on any loan in lieu of the direct cost and without regard to the four percent (4%) limitation;

A bank may require a borrower to pay delinquency charges on installments past due by more than fifteen (15) days; provided, that no charge shall exceed five percent (5%) of any such installment, nor shall any bank impose a delinquency charge on a loan more than once on account of the same past due installment; and

Notwithstanding any other provision herein or elsewhere to the contrary, no bank shall be permitted to charge a commitment fee or brokerage commission in connection with any installment loan made pursuant to this section. (2) (A) A bank, in making an installment loan in excess of three hundred dollars ($300) pursuant to this section, may require a borrower to insure tangible personal property offered as security for the loan against any substantial risk of loss, damage or destruction for any amount not to exceed the actual value of the property or the approximate amount of the loan, whichever is lesser, and for a term and upon conditions that are reasonable and appropriate considering the nature of the property and maturity and other circumstances of the loan; provided, that the insurance is sold by a licensed agent, broker or solicitor and the borrower may furnish the borrower's own insurance policy.

The bank may also request as security for any loan obligation in excess of three hundred dollars ($300) insurance on the life of the borrower or one (1) of them, if there are two (2) or more. The initial amount of credit life insurance shall not exceed the total amount repayable under the total amount of the indebtedness. Not more than one (1) policy of life insurance may be written in connection with any installment loan transaction unless requested by the borrower, comaker or endorser.

In accepting any insurance provided for in this subdivision (b)(2) as security for a loan, the bank may deduct the premiums for the insurance from the proceeds of the loan, and remit the premiums to the insurance company writing the insurance and any gain or advantage to the bank or any employee, officer, director, agent, affiliate, or associate from the insurance or its sale shall not be considered as additional or further charge or interest in connection with any loan made under this section.

Every insurance policy or certificate written in connection with a loan transaction pursuant to this section shall provide for cancellation of coverage and a refund of the premium unearned upon the discharge of the loan obligation for which the insurance is security, without prejudice to any claim existing at the time of discharge. Whenever insurance is written in connection with a loan transaction, the bank shall deliver or cause to be delivered to the borrower a policy, certificate or other memorandum that shows the coverages and the costs of the insurance, if any, to the borrower within thirty (30) days from the date of the loan.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.241); 1979, ch. 205, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 412, § 1; T.C.A., § 45-433.

Law Reviews.

Bank Credit Cards in Tennessee — Usury?, 3 Mem. St. U. L. Rev. 51.

45-2-1107. Disclosure of terms and conditions of loan.

When an installment loan is made and interest is charged as provided in §45-2-1106(b)(1)(A) and (B), the lending bank or trust company shall make disclosures of the terms and conditions of the loan that may from time to time be required for the loan under the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.241); 1979, ch. 205, § 4; T.C.A., § 45-434.

Law Reviews.

Bank Credit Cards in Tennessee — Usury?, 3 Mem. St. U. L. Rev. 51.

45-2-1108. Same power to make loans as national banks.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this chapter and chapter 1 of this title or elsewhere, state banks have the power to make loans upon the same terms and at the maximum effective interest rates as loans are authorized and credit extended by national banks in this state. This power includes, but is not limited to, the right to take, receive, reserve and charge on any loan or discount made, or upon any notes, bills of exchange, or other evidence of debt, interest at a maximum effective interest rate of one percent (1%) in excess of the discount rate on ninety-day commercial paper in effect at the federal reserve bank in the federal reserve district where the state bank is located.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.241); 1979, ch. 209, § 1; T.C.A., § 45-435.

Law Reviews.

Residential Mortgage Lending: Charting a Course Through the Regulatory Maze, 29 Vand. L. Rev. 957.